Washington statutes.
RCW 35.77.040

Agreements with county for planning, establishment, construction, and maintenance—Act is additional and concurrent method.

RCW 35.77.020 through 35.77.040 shall not repeal, amend, or modify any law providing for joint or cooperative agreements between cities and counties with respect to city streets, but shall be held to be an additional and concurrent method providing for such purpose.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.77.040. Prior: 1961 c 245 s 3.]